Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
CHAPTER 16 Action for Disparagement of Perishable Food Products or Commodities

2-16-1.
Legislative findings, determinations, and declaration.

The General Assembly finds, determines, and declares that the production of agricultural and aquacultural food products and commodities constitutes an important and significant portion of the state economy and that it is imperative to protect the vitality of the agricultural and aquacultural economy for the citizens of this state by providing a cause of action for producers, marketers, or sellers to recover damages for the disparagement of any perishable product or commodity.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-16-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1795, § 1.

Law reviews.

For note, “Must Peaches Be Preserved at All Costs? Questioning the Constitutional Validity of Georgia’s Perishable Product Disparagement Law,” see 12 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1223.

2-16-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Disparagement” means the willful or malicious dissemination to the public in any manner of false information that a perishable food product or commodity is not safe for human consumption. The information shall be deemed to be false if it is not based upon reasonable and reliable scientific inquiry, facts, or data.

“Perishable food product or commodity” means any agricultural or aquacultural food product which is sold or distributed in a form that will perish or decay beyond marketability within a period of time.

“Producers, processors, marketers, and sellers” shall include the entire chain from grower to consumer.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-16-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1795, § 1.

2-16-3.
Cause of action for disparagement of perishable food products or commodities.

Any person who produces, markets, or sells a perishable food product or commodity and suffers damage as a result of another person’s disparagement of such perishable food products or commodities has a cause of action for damages and for any other relief a court of competent jurisdiction deems appropriate, including, but not limited to, compensatory and punitive damages.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-16-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1795, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, the designation “(a)” was deleted from the beginning.

2-16-4.
Limitations of actions.

Any civil action for damages for disparagement of perishable agricultural or aquacultural food products or commodities shall be commenced within two years after the cause of action accrues.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-16-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1795, § 1.